Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 19. Money Order Sellers and Money Transmitters.
§ 6.2-1916.
Retention of books, accounts, and records.

Every licensee shall maintain in its principal place of business such books, accounts, and records as the Commission may reasonably require in order to determine whether such licensee is complying with the provisions of this chapter and other laws applicable to the conduct of its licensed business. Such books, accounts, and records shall be maintained apart and separate from any other business in which the licensee is involved.

Each licensee shall retain the following records for at least three years:

A record of each money transmission transaction and money order sold;

A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset, liability, capital, income, and expense accounts;

Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;

Records of outstanding money orders and money transmission transactions;

Records of each money order and money transmission transaction paid or completed within the three-year period; and

A list of the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all of the licensee’s authorized delegates.

Each licensee shall maintain policies and procedures sufficient for it to comply with this chapter and all other laws and regulations applicable to the conduct of its licensed business. A licensee shall furnish copies of its policies and procedures, as amended, to all of its authorized delegates.

History.

2009, c. 346, § 6.1-378.5; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454, in subsection A, substituted “principal place of business” for “licensed offices.”

§ 6.2-1917.
Other reporting requirements.

A licensee or other person shall file a report with the Commissioner within 15 days after the licensee or other person becomes aware of any material changes in information previously provided in an application filed under §

6.2-1903

or

6.2-1914

. This requirement shall be applicable only to material changes that occur within one year after the date the licensee begins business or the acquisition is consummated.

A licensee shall file with the Commissioner no later than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter its quarterly financial statements along with a current list of all authorized delegates and locations where the licensee or an authorized delegate of the licensee sells money orders or receives money for transmission. The licensee shall state the name, street address, and telephone number of each location and authorized delegate.

A licensee shall file a report with the Commissioner within one business day after the licensee becomes aware of the occurrence of any of the following events:

The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for bankruptcy or reorganization;

The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;

The commencement of administrative or regulatory proceedings against the licensee by any governmental authority;

The cancellation or other impairment of the licensee’s bond or other security;

Any felony indictment of the licensee or any of its members, partners, directors, officers, principals, or authorized delegates;

Any felony conviction of the licensee or any of its members, partners, directors, officers, principals, or authorized delegates; or

Such other events as the Commission may prescribe by regulation.

Any reports or filings required by this section may be submitted to the Commissioner through the Registry, provided that the Registry is capable of receiving such reports or filings.

History.

2009, c. 346, § 6.1-378.6; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454; 2019, c. 634.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454 substituted “Commissioner” for “Commission” throughout the section; in subsection B, deleted “in the Commonwealth” following “and locations”; and deleted subsection D, which read “A licensee shall within 10 days notify the Commissioner, in writing, of the name, address and position of each new member, senior officer, partner, or director and provide such other information with respect to any change as the Commissioner may reasonably require.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 634 added subsection D.

§ 6.2-1918.
Maintenance of permissible investments.

A licensee shall maintain at all times permissible investments that have a market value computed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the aggregate dollar amount of all of its (i) outstanding money orders from all states and (ii) outstanding money transmission transactions from all states. For purposes of this subsection, a licensee may calculate the aggregate dollar amount of its outstanding stored value products in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

The Commission, with respect to any licensees, may limit the extent to which a type of investment within a class of permissible investments may be considered a permissible investment, except for money and certificates of deposit issued by a bank. The Commission may prescribe by regulation other types of investments that the Commission determines to have a safety substantially equivalent to other permissible investments.

Permissible investments shall be deemed to be held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee’s outstanding money orders and money transmission services in the event of bankruptcy or receivership of the licensee.

History.

2009, c. 346, § 6.1-378.7; 2010, c. 794; 2017, c. 654.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 654 added the last sentence in subsection A and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 6.2-1919.
Types of permissible investments.

Except to the extent otherwise limited by the Commission pursuant to §

6.2-1918

, the following investments are permissible under §

6.2-1918

:

Cash, a certificate of deposit, or senior debt obligation of an insured depository institution, as defined in section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813).

A banker’s acceptance or bill of exchange that is eligible for purchase upon endorsement by a member bank of the Federal Reserve System and is eligible for purchase by a Federal Reserve Bank.

An investment bearing a rating of one of the three highest grades, as defined by a nationally recognized organization that rates securities.

An investment security that is an obligation of the United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; an investment in an obligation that is guaranteed fully as to principal and interest by the United States; or an investment in an obligation of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof.

Receivables that are payable to a licensee from its authorized delegates, pursuant to contracts and in the ordinary course of business, that are not past due or doubtful of collection. A receivable shall be deemed to be past due or doubtful of collection if the money owed to the licensee is not remitted within seven business days. However, the aggregate amount of receivables under this subdivision from any one person shall not comprise more than 10 percent of the licensee’s total permissible investments.

A share or a certificate issued by an open-end management investment company that is registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission under the Investment Companies Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.), and whose portfolio is restricted by the management company’s investment policy to investments specified in subdivisions 1 through 4.

The following investments are permissible under §

6.2-1918

, but only to the extent specified:

An interest-bearing bill, note, bond, or debenture of a person whose equity shares are traded on a national securities exchange or on a national over-the-counter market, if the aggregate of investments under this subdivision does not exceed 20 percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not at one time hold investments under this subdivision in any one person aggregating more than 10 percent of the licensee’s total permissible investments;

A share of a person traded on a national securities exchange or a national over-the-counter market or a share or a certificate issued by an open-end management investment company that is registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission under the Investment Companies Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.), and whose portfolio is restricted by the management company’s investment policy to shares of a person traded on a national securities exchange or a national over-the-counter market, if the aggregate of investments under this subdivision does not exceed 20 percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not at one time hold investments in any one person aggregating more than 10 percent of the licensee’s total permissible investments;

A demand-borrowing agreement made to a corporation or a subsidiary of a corporation whose securities are traded on a national securities exchange if the aggregate of the amount of principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing agreements under this subdivision does not exceed 20 percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee and the licensee does not at one time hold principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing agreements under this subdivision with any one person aggregating more than 10 percent of the licensee’s total permissible investments; and

Any other investment the Commission designates, to the extent specified by the Commission.

The aggregate of investments under subsection B may not exceed 50 percent of the total permissible investments of a licensee calculated in accordance with §

6.2-1918

.

History.

2009, c. 346, § 6.1-378.8; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454, in subdivision A 5, inserted “pursuant to contracts and,” substituted “that” for “pursuant to contracts which,” and deleted “if the licensee does not hold at one time” at the end of the first sentence and inserted “A receivable shall be deemed to be past due or doubtful of collection if the money owed to the licensee is not remitted within seven business days. However, the aggregate amount of” and substituted “shall not comprise” for “aggregating,” and deleted the last sentence, which read “An authorizing delegate shall remit all money owing to the licensee in accordance with the terms of the contract between the licensee and the authorized delegate but in no event more than seven business days.”

§ 6.2-1920.
Civil penalties.

In addition to the authority conferred under §§

6.2-1907

and

6.2-1909

, the Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $2,500 upon any person licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter who the Commission determines has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the person’s business. For the purposes of this section, each separate violation shall be subject to the civil penalty herein prescribed. In the case of a violation of §

6.2-1901

, each money order sale or money transmission transaction shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

2001, c. 372, § 6.1-378.4; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1921.
Criminal penalty.

Any person required by this chapter to have a license who sells money orders or engages in the business of money transmission without first being licensed as required by §

6.2-1901

is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-375; 1976, c. 531; 1990, c. 259; 1994, c. 889; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346, 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.